Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 2 Accident and Mistake

Cross references.

Pleading requirements in actions involving mistake, §

9-11-9

.

Effect of mistake on enforcement of contract, §

13-5-4

.

23-2-20.
Which accidents relievable in equity.

An accident relievable in equity is an occurrence, not the result of negligence or misconduct of the party seeking relief in relation to a contract, as was not anticipated by the parties when the contract was entered into, which gives an undue advantage to one of them over another in a court of law.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3045; Code 1868, § 3057; Code 1873, § 3112; Code 1882, § 3112; Civil Code 1895, § 3968; Civil Code 1910, § 4565; Code 1933, § 37-201.

23-2-21.
What mistakes relievable in equity; power to relieve to be exercised cautiously.

A mistake relievable in equity is some unintentional act, omission, or error arising from ignorance, surprise, imposition, or misplaced confidence.

Mistakes may be either of law or of fact.

The power to relieve mistakes shall be exercised with caution; to justify it, the evidence shall be clear, unequivocal, and decisive as to the mistake.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 3050, 3053; Code 1868, §§ 3062, 3065; Code 1873, §§ 3117, 3120; Code 1882, §§ 3117, 3120; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3973, 3977; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4570, 4574; Code 1933, §§ 37-202, 37-203.

Cross references.

Form of complaint for money paid by mistake, §

9-11-107

.

Law reviews.

For note, the voluntary-payment doctrine in Georgia, see 16 Ga. L. Rev. 893 (1982).

23-2-22.
Mistake of law in instrument by contracting parties.

An honest mistake of the law as to the effect of an instrument on the part of both contracting parties, when the mistake operates as a gross injustice to one and gives an unconscionable advantage to the other, may be relieved in equity.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3055; Code 1868, § 3067; Code 1873, § 3122; Code 1882, § 3122; Civil Code 1895, § 3979; Civil Code 1910, § 4576; Code 1933, § 37-204.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of recent developments, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 473 (1986).

23-2-23.
Mistake of law in instrument by agent.

A mistake of law by the draftsman or other agent, by which the contract, as executed, does not fulfill or violates the manifest intention of the parties to the agreement, may be relieved in equity.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3056; Code 1868, § 3068; Code 1873, § 3123; Code 1882, § 3123; Civil Code 1895, § 3980; Civil Code 1910, § 4577; Code 1933, § 37-205.

23-2-24.
When mistake of fact relieved.

In all cases of a mistake of fact material to the contract or other matter affected by it, if the complaining party applies within a reasonable time, equity will grant relief.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3058; Code 1868, § 3070; Code 1873, § 3125; Code 1882, § 3125; Civil Code 1895, § 3983; Civil Code 1910, § 4580; Code 1933, § 37-206.

23-2-25.
Form of conveyance contrary to intent.

If the form of conveyance is, by accident or mistake, contrary to the intention of the parties in their contract, equity shall interfere to make it conform thereto.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3047; Code 1868, § 3059; Code 1873, § 3114; Code 1882, § 3114; Civil Code 1895, § 3970; Civil Code 1910, § 4567; Code 1933, § 37-215.

Law reviews.

For comment advocating principle that grantee may obtain reformation of deed of gift over opposition of heirs of grantor, see 25 Ga. B.J. 445 (1963).

23-2-26.
Accident or mistake in execution of power.

Accident or mistake in the execution of a power or causing the defective execution of the power will be remedied in equity.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3061; Code 1868, § 3073; Code 1873, § 3128; Code 1882, § 3128; Civil Code 1895, § 3986; Civil Code 1910, § 4583; Code 1933, § 37-218.

23-2-27.
Equitable interference not authorized by mere ignorance of law.

Mere ignorance of the law on the part of the party himself, where the facts are all known and there is no misplaced confidence and no artifice, deception, or fraudulent practice is used by the other party either to induce the mistake of law or to prevent its correction, shall not authorize the intervention of equity.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3054; Code 1868, § 3066; Code 1873, § 3121; Code 1882, § 3121; Civil Code 1895, § 3978; Civil Code 1910, § 4575; Code 1933, § 37-209.

23-2-28.
Equitable interference not authorized by mutual ignorance of fact; mistake in judgment of value.

Ignorance of a fact by both parties shall not justify the interference of equity; nor shall a mistake in judgment or opinion merely as to the value of property authorize such interference.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3060; Code 1868, § 3072; Code 1873, § 3127; Code 1882, § 3127; Civil Code 1895, § 3985; Civil Code 1910, § 4582; Code 1933, § 37-210.

23-2-29.
Equitable interference not authorized by failure to exercise diligence; ignorance of fact absent fraud.

If a party, by reasonable diligence, could have had knowledge of the truth, equity shall not grant relief; nor shall the ignorance of a fact known to the opposite party justify an interference if there has been no misplaced confidence, misrepresentation, or other fraudulent act.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3059; Code 1868, § 3071; Code 1873, § 3126; Code 1882, § 3126; Civil Code 1895, § 3984; Civil Code 1910, § 4581; Code 1933, § 37-211.

Law reviews.

For article, “Limitations on the Meaning and Impact of DeGarmo v. DeGarmo,” see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 20 (1998).

23-2-30.
Reformation and execution of contract in case of mistake distinguished.

A distinction exists between reforming a contract and executing a contract in case of mistake. To authorize the former, the court shall be satisfied by the evidence that the mistake was mutual; but the court may refuse to act in the latter case if the mistake is confined to the party refusing to execute.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3057; Code 1868, § 3069; Code 1873, § 3124; Code 1882, § 3124; Civil Code 1895, § 3981; Civil Code 1910, § 4578; Code 1933, § 37-208.

23-2-31.
Rescission for unilateral mistake of fact.

Equity will not reform a written contract unless the mistake is shown to be the mistake of both parties; but it may rescind and cancel upon the ground of mistake of fact material to the contract of one party only.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 3982; Civil Code 1910, § 4579; Code 1933, § 37-207.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decision in Werner v. Rawson,

89 Ga. 619

,

15 S.E. 813

(1892).

Law reviews.

For article, “Limitations on the Meaning and Impact of DeGarmo v. DeGarmo,” see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 20 (1998).

23-2-32.
When negligent complainant granted relief.

The negligence of the complaining party, preventing relief in equity, is that want of reasonable prudence, the absence of which would be a violation of legal duty.

Relief may be granted even in cases of negligence by the complainant if it appears that the other party has not been prejudiced thereby.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 3974; Civil Code 1910, § 4571; Code 1933, § 37-212.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decision in Werner v. Rawson,

89 Ga. 619

,

15 S.E. 813

(1892).

Law reviews.

For article, “Limitations on the Meaning and Impact of DeGarmo v. DeGarmo,” see 4 Ga. St. B.J. 20 (1998).

23-2-33.
Mere volunteers, in general; exception for executed contracts.

Equity will not interfere to relieve against accidents or mistakes of mere volunteers; but, if a contract is actually executed, all the rights growing out of it against or in favor of any one will be enforced.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3049; Code 1868, § 3061; Code 1873, § 3116; Code 1882, § 3116; Civil Code 1895, § 3972; Civil Code 1910, § 4569; Code 1933, § 37-217.

23-2-34.
Relief against original parties or privies; exception.

Equity will grant relief as between the original parties or their privies in law, in fact, or in estate, except bona fide purchasers for value without notice.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3052; Code 1868, § 3064; Code 1873, § 3119; Code 1882, § 3119; Civil Code 1895, § 3976; Civil Code 1910, § 4573; Code 1933, § 37-213.